District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

33-201.08

Applicability.

Repealed.

History

Dec. 10, 1987
D.C. Law 7-49, § 108, 34 DCR 6856
June 19, 2001, D.C. Law 13-313, § 15, 48 DCR 1873
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(y), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 41-408.